Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97C.335, is amended to read: 97C.335 deleted text begin USE OFdeleted text end new text begin RESTRICTIONS ON USINGnew text end ARTIFICIAL LIGHTS new text begin AND SONAR new text end TO TAKE FISH deleted text begin PROHIBITEDdeleted text end . new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Using lights prohibited. new text end (a) A person may not use artificial lights to lure or attract fish or to see fish in the water while spearing, except that while angling or spearing, a person may: (1) affix a lighted artificial bait with hooks attached to the end of a fishing line; or (2) use a lighted decoy for spearing. (b) A battery that is used in lighted fishing lures must not contain mercury. (c) The restrictions in paragraph (a) do not apply to bow fishing. new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Using sonar. new text end new text begin (a) While fishing for muskellunge or northern pike in waters identified by the commissioner as waters where muskellunge populations are naturally reproducing and not primarily maintained through stocking, a person may not use, operate, or possess any of the following in an active or deployable state: new text end new text begin (1) live imaging sonar, forward-facing sonar, omnidirectional sonar, or drones; or new text end new text begin (2) equipment, software, or systems that use, integrate with, or enhance live imaging sonar, including but not limited to technologies employing artificial intelligence, predictive modeling, real-time data processing, or wireless communication between devices or components to locate, track, or target muskellunge or northern pike. new text end new text begin (b) Possession of any of the items described in paragraph (a) on waters identified by the commissioner as waters where muskellunge populations are naturally reproducing and not primarily maintained through stocking, shores of those waters, or islands in those waters is presumptive evidence that the person is in violation of this subdivision, unless: new text end new text begin (1) the equipment is powered off; new text end new text begin (2) the equipment has all power and transducer cables physically disconnected from the unit; new text end new text begin (3) the equipment has all disconnected power leads and transducer connections visibly secured in a manner that prevents immediate reconnection, including but not limited to being capped, taped, clamped, or otherwise enclosed; and new text end new text begin (4) the equipment, software, or systems cannot be made operational via wireless, remote, or software- or application-based activation without deliberate physical connection. new text end